Utah statutes.
58-73-302.   Qualifications for licensure.

(1)  Each applicant for licensure as a chiropractic physician, other than those applying for a license based on licensure as a chiropractor or chiropractic physician in another jurisdiction, shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  be of good moral character;

(d)  demonstrate satisfactory completion of at least two years of general study in a college or university;

(e)  demonstrate having earned a degree of doctor of chiropractic from a chiropractic college or university that at the time the degree was conferred was accredited by the Council on Chiropractic Education, Inc., or an equivalent chiropractic accrediting body recognized by the United States Department of Education and by the division rule made in collaboration with the board;

(f)  demonstrate successful completion of:

(i)  the National Chiropractic Boards:

(A)  Parts I and II;

(B)  Written Clinical Competency Examination; and

(C)  Physical Therapy;

(ii)  the Utah Chiropractic Law and Rules Examination; and

(iii)  a practical examination approved by the division in collaboration with the board; and

(g)  meet with the board, if requested, for the purpose of reviewing the applicant's qualifications for licensure.

(2)  Each applicant for licensure as a chiropractic physician based on licensure as a chiropractor or chiropractic physician in another jurisdiction shall:

(a)  submit an application in the form prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  be of good moral character;

(d)  demonstrate having obtained licensure as a chiropractor or chiropractic physician in another state under education requirements which were equivalent to the education requirements in this state to obtain a chiropractor or chiropractic physician license at the time the applicant obtained the license in the other state;

(e)  demonstrate successful completion of:

(i)  the Utah Chiropractic Law and Rules Examination; and

(ii)  the Special Purposes Examination for Chiropractic (SPEC) of the National Board of Chiropractic Examiners;

(f)  have been actively engaged in the practice of chiropractic for not less than two years immediately preceding application for licensure in this state; and

(g)  meet with the board, if requested, for the purpose of reviewing the applicant's qualifications for licensure.

